Idaho, session 2026, H0807.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 22, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-2208, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-2208. LEGISLATIVE APPROVAL -- FAMILY PERSONAL CARE SERVICES. (1)
The department of health and welfare is authorized to and shall submit to the
centers for medicare and medicaid services all state plan and waiver author-
ities required to allow for legally responsible individuals to provide per-
sonal care services.
(2) Personal care services provided by a legally responsible individ-
ual pursuant to this section shall:
(a) Be limited to twenty-five (25) hours per week at the assessed level
of care as determined by the department of health and welfare; and
(b) Be subject to oversight as deemed necessary by the department of
health and welfare.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an individ-
ual who requires more than twenty-five (25) hours per week of personal care
services from receiving such additional care from a non-legally responsible
individual in accordance with applicable law.
(4) The number of legally responsible individuals authorized to pro-
vide personal care services at one time pursuant to this section shall not
exceed one thousand (1,000).
(5) The department of health and welfare may promulgate rules, subject
to legislative approval, to establish procedures regarding the creation and
management of a wait list and otherwise carry out the provisions of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.